Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1613
Self-funding or self-funded, defined.

Self-funding or self-funded shall mean assumption of primary liability or responsibility for certain risks or benefits rather than transferring the liability or responsibility to some other entity and may include the deductible portion when a plan sponsor assumes some or all of the risk for the deductible of an insured plan.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 13.